Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-1,116
Department of Health and Human Services and Department of Revenue; confidential information; disclosures authorized; improper disclosure; how treated.

(1) Beginning no later than October 31, 2026, the Department of Health and Human Services and the Department of Revenue, for the purpose of the proper administration of the laws administered by each agency, shall, upon request, disclose confidential information about persons, businesses, and state and local subdivisions to the other agency. The receiving agency shall not use any confidential information obtained from the transmitting agency except for purposes directly connected with the proper administration of the laws administered by each agency.

(2) The disclosures allowed under this section may be made notwithstanding any other provision of law of this state regarding disclosure of information by either agency. Any information received by either agency under this section shall be considered confidential as required by any applicable state laws or rules and regulations which govern the transmitting agency's disclosure of the information and any use of such information after such disclosure. Any individual who discloses such information other than as specifically allowed by this section or other laws of this state shall be subject to the penalties normally imposed on individuals who improperly disclose such information.

Laws 2026, LB901, § 5.
July 1, 2026